New York, session 2025-2026, A1688.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 76 of the workers' compensation law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. The purposes of the state insurance fund created in this section 4 are hereby enlarged to permit it to furnish title insurance policies, as 5 defined in subsection (b) of section six thousand four hundred one of 6 the insurance law, and/or certificates of clear title. A separate fund 7 is hereby created within the state insurance fund, which shall be known 8 as the "title insurance fund", and which shall consist of all premiums 9 received and paid into said fund on account of such insurance, all secu- 10 rities acquired by and through the use of moneys belonging to said fund 11 and of interest earned upon moneys belonging to said fund and deposited 12 or invested as herein provided. Said title insurance fund shall be 13 applicable to the payments, expenses and assessments on account of title 14 insurance policies written pursuant to the rules and regulations estab- 15 lished by the superintendent of financial services. 16 § 2. The superintendent of financial services is hereby: 17 1. directed to create, within the insurance department, a title insur- 18 ance bureau which shall implement the title insurance program estab- 19 lished by this act; and 20 2. authorized to prescribe, amend and withdraw rules and regulations 21 implementing the provisions of subdivision 6 of section 76 of the work- 22 ers' compensation law, as added by section one of this act. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03708-01-5